Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5002
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Tax Equalization and Review Commission Act:

(1) Commission means the Tax Equalization and Review Commission;

(2) Commissioner means a member of the commission; and

(3) Special master means a person appointed by the commission pursuant to section 77-5009.

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 2.